utilities/dictionaries/ia_IA-Interlingua.aff
##################################################################
# Interlingua - Regulas de affixation                            #
# (c) 2009-2013 Artek Dzialek (artur<point>dzialek<at>gazeta.pl) #
# Iste software es licentiate secundo GPL 3.                     #
##################################################################

VERSION 2014-05-18
SET UTF-8
FLAG UTF-8

TRY eaiortncslpmuhdgbyfvxqzkjwàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöõøùúûüýÿ'EAIORTNCSLPMUHDGBYFVXQZKJWÀÁÂÄÃÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÕØÙÚÛÜÝŸ
KEY qwa|wes|erd|rtf|tyg|yuh|uij|iok|opl|asz|sdx|dfc|fgv|ghb|hjn|jkm|kl|zxs|xcd|cvf|vbg|bnh|nmj

WORDCHARS -’'0123456789

#NOSPLITSUGS
NOSUGGEST !
NEEDAFFIX _
KEEPCASE |
COMPOUNDFLAG +

COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG H
COMPOUNDBEGIN I
COMPOUNDEND J
ONLYINCOMPOUND K

COMPOUNDMIN 2
COMPOUNDRULE 1
COMPOUNDRULE Y*Z


MAP 16
MAP aàáâäã
MAP cç
MAP eèéêë
MAP iìíîï
MAP nñ
MAP oòóôöõø
MAP uùúûü
MAP yýÿ
MAP AÀÁÂÄÃ
MAP CÇ
MAP EÈÉÊË
MAP IÌÍÎÏ
MAP NÑ
MAP OÒÓÔÖÕØ
MAP UÙÚÛÜ
MAP YỲŸ

REP 64
REP c qu
REP qu c
REP ch c
REP c ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP ch q
REP q ch
REP ph f
REP f ph
REP rh r
REP r rh
REP th t
REP t th
REP x ct
REP ct x
REP bb b
REP b bb
REP cc c
REP c cc
REP ff f
REP f ff
REP ll l
REP l ll
REP mm m
REP m mm
REP nn n
REP n nn
REP pp p
REP p pp
REP rr r
REP r rr
REP ss s
REP s ss
REP ss c
REP c ss
REP tt t
REP t tt
REP z zz
REP zz z
REP ae ä
REP ä ae
REP oe ö
REP ö oe
REP ue ü
REP ü ue
REP au o
REP ea i
REP i ea
REP o au
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP a$ e
REP a$ o
REP e$ a
REP e$ o
REP o$ a
REP o$ e
REP as$ es
REP as$ os
REP es$ as
REP es$ os
REP os$ as
REP os$ es

SFX A Y 41
SFX A   0   0   [iechklnr]  ds:e po:adj
SFX A   0   e   i           ds:e po:adj
SFX A   i-  e   i-          ds:e po:adj
SFX A   c-  0   c-          ds:e po:adj
SFX A   0   o   [ichklnr]   ds:o po:adv
SFX A   e   o   e           ds:o po:adv
SFX A   -   o   [ci]-       ds:o po:adv
SFX A   0   mente   [eilnr] ds:mente po:adv
SFX A   0   emente  i       ds:mente po:adv
SFX A   i-  emente  i-      ds:mente po:adv
SFX A   0   amente  [chk]   ds:mente po:adv
SFX A   -   amente  c-      ds:mente po:adv
SFX A   0   issime/_B   [hklnr] ds:issim
SFX A   e   issime/_B   [^i]e   ds:issim
SFX A   e   ssime/_B    ie      ds:issim
SFX A   0   ssime/_B    i       ds:issim
SFX A   -   ssime/_B    i-      ds:issim
SFX A   0   hissime/_B  c       ds:issim
SFX A   -   hissime/_B  c-      ds:issim
SFX A   0   0   [echklnr]   ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX A   0   e   i           ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX A   i-  e   i-          ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX A   c-  0   c-          ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX A   e   o   e           ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX A   0   o   [ichklnr]   ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX A   -   o   [ci]-       ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX A   e   a   e           ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX A   0   a   [ichklnr]   ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX A   -   a   [ci]-       ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX A   0   s   e           ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX A   0   es  [hklnr]     ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX A   0   es  i           ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX A   i-  es  i-          ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX A   0   hes c           ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX A   -   hes c-          ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX A   e   os  e           ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX A   0   os  [ichklnr]   ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX A   -   os  [ci]-       ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX A   e   as  e           ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX A   0   as  [ichklnr]   ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX A   -   as  [ci]-       ds:a is:pl po:sb
#SFX A  0  -    [eilnr] ds:- po:adv
#SFX A  0  e-   i       ds:- po:adv
#SFX A  i- e-   i-      ds:- po:adv
#SFX A  0  a-   [chk]   ds:a- po:adv
#SFX A  -  a-   c-      ds:a- po:adv
#Flag for adjectives and derived nouns of two forms ending with -o and -a "following 1/2 declension"
#special endings uzbek, tadjik, kazakh

SFX B Y 19
SFX B   0  0    [eiclnr]    ds:e po:adj
SFX B   0  e    i           ds:e po:adj
SFX B   e  o    e           ds:o po:adv
SFX B   0  o    [iclnr]     ds:o po:adv
SFX B   0  mente    [ielnr] ds:mente po:adv
SFX B   0  amente   c       ds:mente po:adv
SFX B   0  0    [eclnr] ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX B   0  e    i       ds:e is:sg po:sb
SFX B   e  o    e       ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX B   0  o    [iclnr] ds:o is:sg po:sb
SFX B   e  a    e       ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX B   0  a    [iclnr] ds:a is:sg po:sb
SFX B   0  s    e       ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX B   0  es   [ilnr]  ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX B   0  hes  c       ds:e is:pl po:sb
SFX B   e  os   e       ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX B   0  os   [iclnr] ds:o is:pl po:sb
SFX B   e  as   e       ds:a is:pl po:sb
SFX B   0  as   [iclnr] ds:a is:pl po:sb
#SFX B  0  -    [ielnr] ds:- po:adv
#SFX B  0  a-   c       ds:a- po:adv
#Continuation flag for derived adjectives

SFX C Y 1
SFX C  0  0    .   po:adj
#Flag for invariable adjectives derived by conversion from nouns or attributively used phrases

SFX D Y 1
SFX D   0  0    .   po:adv
#Flag for simple adverbs and adverbly used phrases

SFX E Y 13
SFX E   0  0        [aeiyuclmnrt]   ds:0 po:adj
SFX E   0  mente    [aeiyuclnmt]    ds:mente po:adv
SFX E   0  mente    [^o]r           ds:mente po:adv
SFX E   0  mente    [^tsx]or        ds:mente po:adv
SFX E   a  issime/_B    [^c]a       ds:issim
SFX E   a  hissime/_B   ca          ds:issim
SFX E   e  issime/_B    e           ds:issim
SFX E   0  ssime/_B     i           ds:issim
SFX E   0  issime/_B    [yulnmrt]   ds:issim
SFX E   0  hissime/_B   c           ds:issim
SFX E   0  0        [aeiyuclmnrt]   ds:0 is:sg po:sb
SFX E   0  s        [aeiyuct]       ds:0 is:pl po:sb
SFX E   0  es       [lmnr]          ds:0 is:pl po:sb
#SFX E  0  -        [aeiyuclnmt]    ds:- po:adv
#SFX E  0  -        [^o]r           ds:- po:adv
#SFX E  0  -        [^tsx]or        ds:- po:adv
#Flag for one form adjectives from the "purist list", "following 3/4 declension",
#+chic, nonchalant, flamboyant because of chicmente, nonchalantmente, flamboyantmente

SFX F Y 5
SFX F   0  0        [aer]   ds:0 po:adj
SFX F   0  mente    [ae]    ds:mente po:adv
SFX F   0  0        [aer]   ds:0 is:sg po:sb
SFX F   0  s        [ae]    ds:0 is:pl po:sb
SFX F   0  es       [tsx]or ds:0 is:pl po:sb
#SFX F  0  -     [ae]    ds:-   po:adv
#Continuation flag for derived adjectives ending with -ante/-ente, -abile/-ibile, -ista and -tor/-sor/-xor

SFX G Y 1
SFX G   0   0   .   is:sg po:sb

SFX L Y 1
SFX L   0   0   .   is:pl po:sb

SFX M Y 2
SFX M   o   a/_S    o    ds:a
SFX M   or  rice/_S tor  ds:rice
